Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-107.01
Car toter or tow dolly, defined.

Car toter or tow dolly means a two-wheeled conveyance designed or adapted to support the weight of one axle of a motor vehicle while being towed in combination behind another motor vehicle.

Laws 2018, LB909, § 12.